Wisconsin, session 2025, SB79.
do enact as follows:SB79,11Section 1. 48.41 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB79,2,7248.41 (1) The court may terminate the parental rights of a parent after the 3parent has given his or her consent as specified in this section. When such 4voluntary consent is given as provided in this section sub. (2) (a), (b), or (c) to (e) or 5when an affidavit of disclaimer of parental rights executed under sub. (2) (bm) is 6irrevocable, the judge may proceed immediately to a disposition of the matter after 7considering the standard and factors specified in s. 48.426.SB79,28Section 2. 48.41 (2) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:SB79,2,16948.41 (2) (bm) 1. Subject to subd. 1m., a mother, father, or presumed or 10alleged father may consent to the termination of any parental rights that he or she 11may have with respect to a child who is under one year of age if no participant in the 12court proceeding, including the mother, father, or presumed or alleged father, knows 13or has reason to know that the child is an Indian child by the method provided in 14par. (a) or (b) or by filing with the court an affidavit of disclaimer of parental rights 15that is signed by 2 witnesses and notarized and that meets the requirements under 16subds. 2. to 8.SB79,3,2171m. A minor may consent to the termination of any parental rights that he or 18she may have with respect to a child by using an affidavit of disclaimer under subd. 191. only after the petition to terminate parental rights has been filed, the agency has 20offered the minor legal counseling under subd. 11., and he or she has been 1appointed a guardian ad litem and only if the guardian ad litem approves the 2disclaimer.SB79,3,432. All of the following apply to the affidavit of disclaimer of parental rights 4under subd. 1.:SB79,3,85a. The affidavit may not be executed after the birth of the child until 120 6hours after the birth of the child and may not be executed on or after the child’s first 7birthday. The father or presumed or alleged father may, but the mother may not, 8execute the affidavit before the birth of the child.SB79,3,139b. If executed by the father or presumed or alleged father, the affidavit is 10revocable for any reason until 72 hours after execution or 120 hours after the birth 11of the child, whichever is later, as provided under subd. 9. If executed by the 12mother, the affidavit is revocable for any reason until 72 hours after execution, as 13provided in subd. 9.SB79,3,1614c. The affidavit is irrevocable if not revoked for any reason by the mother, 15father, or presumed or alleged father by the applicable time limit provided under 16subd. 2. b., unless it was obtained by fraud or duress.SB79,3,1917d. Except as provided in s. 48.028 (5) (b) and (c) and (6), no action to invalidate 18the affidavit, including an action based on fraud or duress, may be commenced 19more than 3 months after the date the affidavit was executed.SB79,3,20203. An affidavit under subd. 1. shall contain all of the following:SB79,3,2221a. The name, county of residence, and age of the parent whose parental rights 22are being terminated.SB79,3,2323b. The name, age, and birth date of the child, if born.SB79,4,31c. The names and addresses of the guardians of the person whose parental 2rights are being terminated, if that person is a minor, and of the estate of the child, 3if any.SB79,4,64d. A statement of whether the person whose parental rights are being 5terminated is or is not presently obligated by court order to make payments for the 6support of the child.SB79,4,87e. A full description and statement of value of all property the child owns or 8possesses.SB79,4,109f. An allegation that termination of parental rights is in the best interest of 10the child.SB79,4,1311g. The name and county of residence of any other parent or presumed or 12alleged father or a statement that the child has no other parent or presumed or 13alleged father.SB79,4,1514h. If applicable, a statement that the parental rights of the other parent or 15presumed or alleged father have been terminated by death or court order.SB79,4,1716i. A statement containing the information and understandings specified in 17subd. 4.SB79,4,1918j. A statement that there is or is not any reason to believe that the child is an 19Indian child.SB79,4,2020k. The date and time that the affidavit is executed.SB79,4,22214. An affidavit under subd. 1. shall contain a statement in substantially the 22following form:SB79,4,2323“I have been informed of and understand all of the following:SB79,5,31A. That a court order terminating parental rights will permanently end all 2legal rights and duties that exist between me and the child, such as the duty to 3support, the right to custody and visitation, and the right to inherit.SB79,5,54B. That there are parenting-related services that would be available to me if I 5chose not to consent to the termination of my parental rights.SB79,5,86C. That this affidavit may not be executed less than 120 hours after the birth 7of the child, on or after the child’s first birthday, or by the child’s mother before the 8birth of the child.SB79,5,129D. That the child’s father or presumed or alleged father has the right to revoke 10an affidavit of disclaimer for any reason until 72 hours after execution or 120 hours 11after the birth of the child, whichever is later, and the child’s mother may revoke the 12affidavit for any reason until 72 hours after execution.SB79,5,1513E. That the affidavit is irrevocable if not revoked for any reason by the mother, 14father, or presumed or alleged father by the applicable time limit under D., above, 15unless it was obtained by fraud or duress.SB79,5,1816F. That no action to invalidate the affidavit, including an action based on 17fraud or duress, may be commenced more than 3 months after the date the affidavit 18was executed.SB79,5,2119G. Prior to executing this affidavit I have been offered counseling at the 20expense of the agency that is placing the child for adoption. I have accepted/refused 21(circle one) this counseling.SB79,6,222H. If I am younger than 18 years of age, prior to executing this affidavit I have 1been offered legal counseling at the expense of the agency that is placing the child 2for adoption. I have accepted/refused (circle one) this legal counseling.”SB79,6,635. An affidavit under subd. 1. shall contain a statement that the person whose 4parental rights are being terminated voluntarily disclaims any rights that he or she 5may have to the child, including the right to notice of proceedings under this 6chapter.SB79,6,1176. If a guardian has not been appointed under s. 48.979, an affidavit under 8subd. 1. may contain the nomination of the department, a county department 9authorized to accept guardianship under s. 48.57 (1) (e) or (hm), or a child welfare 10agency licensed under s. 48.61 (5) to accept guardianship to serve as guardian of the 11child and the nominated guardian’s address.SB79,6,15126m. The person disclaiming his or her parental rights shall choose at least one 13of the witnesses to the affidavit, and that witness shall certify that he or she was 14chosen by that person. Each witness to the affidavit shall certify to all of the 15following:SB79,6,1716a. That he or she has no professional or fiduciary interest in the disclaimer or 17the adoption of the child.SB79,6,1918b. That he or she has knowledge of the relationship between the person 19disclaiming his or her parental rights and the child.SB79,6,2220c. That he or she has discussed the decision to execute the affidavit with the 21person disclaiming his or her parental rights and that, to the best of the witness’s 22knowledge, the affidavit is being signed voluntarily.SB79,6,2323d. That he or she is neutral. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb79 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb79 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB79 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB79 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB79: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting